District of Columbia statutes.
23-312

Joinder of indictments or informations for trial.

The court may order two or more indictments or informations, or both, to be tried together if the offenses, and the defendants if there is more than one, could have been joined in a single indictment or information. The procedure shall be the same as if the prosecution were under such single indictment or information.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-312.
1973 Ed., § 23-312.